Maryland, session 2026, HB0027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Corporation” means the Maryland Technology Development Corporation.
SUBTITLE 4E. LONG COVID INNOVATION GRANT AND LOAN PROGRAM.
10–4E–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “COMMITTEE” MEANS THE INDEPENDENT SCIENTIFIC PEER REVIEW
COMMITTEE WITH WHICH THE CORPORATION CONTRACTS UNDER § 10–4E–04 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) “CORPORATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 10–401 OF THIS TITLE.
(D) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND LONG COVID RESEARCH FUND.
(E) “LONG COVID” HAS THE MEANING:
(1) ESTABLISHED BY THE NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES IN “A
LONG COVID DEFINITION: A CHRONIC, SYSTEMIC DISEASE STATE WITH
PROFOUND CONSEQUENCES” PUBLISHED IN 2024; OR

HOUSE BILL 27 3
(2) IF THE NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES SUBSEQUENTLY
AMENDS THE DEFINITION, THE MEANING MOST RECENTLY ESTABLISHED AND
PUBLISHED BY THE NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES.
(F) “LONG COVID INNOVATION” MEANS RESEARCH, PRODUCT
DEVELOPMENT, AND MANUFACTURING IN THE STATE RELATED TO TREATMENT OF
LONG COVID AND CONDUCTED WITH MONEY FROM THE FUND.
(G) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE GRANT AND LOAN PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY
THE CORPORATION UNDER § 10–4E–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
10–4E–02.
THE CORPORATION SHALL ESTABLISH A GRANT AND LOAN PROGRAM TO
PROVIDE GRANTS AND LOANS FOR STATE–FUNDED LONG COVID INNOVATION.
10–4E–03.
(A) THE CORPORATION SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP CRITERIA, STANDARDS, AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE
REVIEW OF APPLICATIONS FOR A PROGRAM GRANT OR LOAN;
(2) REVIEW, EVALUATE, RANK, AND RATE RESEARCH PROPOSALS FOR
STATE–FUNDED LONG COVID INNOVATION GRANTS AND LOANS BASED ON THE
PROCEDURES AND GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE CORPORATION;
(3) BASED ON RECOMMENDATIONS OF THE COMMITTEE, AWARD AND
DISBURSE GRANTS AND LOANS FROM THE FUND;
(4) ESTABLISH STANDARDS FOR THE OVERSIGHT AND USE OF GRANTS
AND LOANS AWARDED UNDER THE PROGRAM;
(5) CONDUCT PROGRESS OVERSIGHT REVIEWS OF GRANT AND LOAN
RECIPIENTS AND RESCIND FUNDS IF THE CORPORATION DETERMINES THAT A
GRANT RECIPIENT IS FAILING TO MEET THE ESTABLISHED GOALS FOR THE FUNDED
PROJECT; AND
(6) DEVELOP POLICIES AND PROCEDURES GOVERNING CONFLICTS
OF INTEREST BY COMMITTEE MEMBERS, INCLUDING POLICIES AND PROCEDURES
FOR DISCLOSURE AND RECUSAL.

HOUSE BILL 27
(B) THE CORPORATION MAY CONSULT WITH EXPERTS IN PERFORMING ITS
DUTIES.
10–4E–04.
(A) THE CORPORATION SHALL CONTRACT WITH AN INDEPENDENT REVIEW
COMMITTEE COMPOSED OF SCIENTIFIC EXPERTS IN THE FIELD OF LONG COVID
INNOVATION.
(B) THE COMMITTEE SHALL:
(1) REVIEW, EVALUATE, RANK, AND RATE RESEARCH PROPOSALS FOR
STATE–FUNDED LONG COVID INNOVATION:
(I) BASED ON THE PROCEDURES AND GUIDELINES
ESTABLISHED BY THE CORPORATION; AND
(II) IN A MANNER THAT GIVES DUE CONSIDERATION TO THE
SCIENTIFIC, MEDICAL, AND ETHICAL IMPLICATIONS OF THE RESEARCH; AND
(2) BASED ON THE RANKINGS AND RATINGS AWARDED TO THE
RESEARCH PROPOSALS, MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE CORPORATION FOR THE
AWARD AND DISBURSEMENT OF GRANTS AND LOANS.
(C) A MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE:
(1) IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A GRANT OR LOAN FOR
STATE–FUNDED LONG COVID INNOVATION FROM THE FUND; AND
(2) SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE POLICIES AND PROCEDURES
GOVERNING CONFLICTS OF INTEREST ESTABLISHED BY THE CORPORATION UNDER
§ 10–4E–03(A)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
10–4E–05.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND LONG COVID RESEARCH FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROMOTE STATE–FUNDED LIFE
SCIENCES RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, COMMERCIALIZATION, AND
MANUFACTURING IN THE STATE RELATED TO LONG COVID THROUGH GRANTS AND
LOANS TO PUBLIC AND PRIVATE ENTITIES IN THE STATE.
(C) THE CORPORATION SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.

HOUSE BILL 27 5
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) MONEY IN THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO:
(1) AWARD GRANTS AND LOANS FOR STATE–FUNDED LONG COVID
INNOVATION; AND
(2) PAY THE COSTS NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY IN THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) (1) EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION TO THE FUND.
(2) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
10–4E–06.
THE CORPORATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(1) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR AWARDING AND MAKING THE
DISBURSEMENT OF A GRANT OR LOAN UNDER THE PROGRAM;

HOUSE BILL 27
(2) ESTABLISH POLICIES ADDRESSING CONFLICTS OF INTEREST FOR
MEMBERS OF THE COMMITTEE; AND
(3) CARRY OUT ITS DUTIES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
10–4E–07.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE CORPORATION SHALL
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON THE PROGRESS OF THE
LONG COVID INNOVATION CONDUCTED WITH GRANTS OR LOANS AWARDED UNDER
THE PROGRAM.
(B) THE REPORT SHALL IDENTIFY:
(1) EACH RECIPIENT OF A GRANT OR LOAN AWARDED UNDER THE
PROGRAM;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF FUNDING AWARDED TO EACH RECIPIENT;
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF THE TYPE OF STATE–FUNDED LONG COVID
INNOVATION CONDUCTED BY THE RECIPIENT;
(4) INDICATORS OF THE ECONOMIC IMPACT OF GRANTS AND LOANS
MADE FROM THE FUND; AND
(5) ANY RECOMMENDATIONS FOR IMPROVING THE OVERALL
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE PROGRAM.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:

HOUSE BILL 27 7
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND LONG COVID RESEARCH FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.